Utah statutes.
63C-4a-302.   Creation of Commission on Federalism -- Membership meetings -- Staff -- Expenses.

(1)  There is created the Commission on Federalism, comprised of the following seven members:

(a)  the president of the Senate or the president of the Senate's designee who shall serve as cochair of the commission;

(b)  another member of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate;

(c)  the speaker of the House or the speaker of the House's designee who shall serve as cochair of the commission;

(d)  two other members of the House, appointed by the speaker of the House;

(e)  the minority leader of the Senate or the minority leader of the Senate's designee; and

(f)  the minority leader of the House or the minority leader of the House's designee.

(2) (a)  A majority of the members of the commission constitute a quorum of the commission.

(b)  Action by a majority of the members of a quorum constitutes action by the commission.

(3)  The commission shall meet six times each year, unless additional meetings are approved by the Legislative Management Committee.

(4)  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide staff support to the commission.

(5)  Salary and expenses of a member of the commission shall be paid in accordance with Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Chapter 3, Expense and Mileage Reimbursement for Authorized Legislative Meetings, Special Sessions, and Veto Override Sessions.

(6)  Nothing in this section prohibits the commission from closing a meeting under Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, or prohibits the commission from complying with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Enacted by Chapter 101, 2013 General Session

